Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-1103
High-risk agricultural pathogen or pest; import prohibited, when.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person shall:

(a) Knowingly import a high-risk agricultural pathogen or pest into this state; or

(b) Import a high-risk agricultural pathogen or pest into this state with a conscious disregard of a substantial or unjustifiable risk that the high-risk agricultural pathogen or pest could cause significant harm to crops, livestock, or agricultural ecosystems.

(2) A person may import a high-risk agricultural pathogen or pest into this state if such person possesses a permit or authorization for such importation from the department or the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

Laws 2026, LB1096, § 3.
July 18, 2026